New York, session 2025-2026, S7768.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 8 of section 13-0325 of the environmental 2 conservation law, as amended by chapter 369 of the laws of 2022, is 3 amended to read as follows: 4 8. The department may, until December thirty-first, two thousand 5 [twenty-five] twenty-eight, adopt by regulation measures for the manage- 6 ment of hard clams (Mercenaria mercenaria), soft or steamer clams (Mya 7 arenaria), and razor clams (Ensis sp.), including size limits, catch and 8 possession limits, open and closed seasons, closed areas, restrictions 9 on the manner of taking and landing, requirements for permits and eligi- 10 bility therefor, recordkeeping and identification requirements, require- 11 ments on the amount and type of fishing effort and gear, and require- 12 ments relating to transportation, possession and sale, provided that 13 such regulations are no less restrictive than requirements set forth in 14 this chapter. 15 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09953-01-5